Alabama, session 2026rs, HB418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
83 Section 1. Sections 8-15-41, 8-15-44, 8-15-45, and
84 8-15-46, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
Page 3

8-15-46, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
HB418 INTRODUCED
85 "§8-15-41
86 For the purposes of this article, the following terms
87 shall have the following meanings:
88 (1) COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE SALE. A sale, conducted
89 pursuant to this article, at the self-service storage
90 facility, another suitable location selected by the operator,
91 or on a publicly accessible website that conducts lien sales
92 or personal property sales.
93 (2) DEFAULT. The failure by the occupant to perform on
94 time any obligation or duty set forth in a rental agreement or
95 in this article.
96 (3) ELECTRONIC MAIL. An electronic message or an
97 executable program or computer file that contains an image of
98 a message that is transmitted between two or more computers or
99 electronic terminals and includes electronic messages that are
100 transmitted within or between computer networks.
101 (4) EMERGENCY. Any occurrence or circumstance at or
102 near a self-service storage facility which requires immediate
103 action to avoid injury to persons or damage to property at or
104 near the self-service storage facility including, but not
105 limited to, a fire.
106 (5) LAST KNOWN ADDRESS. The postal address or
107 electronic mail address provided by an occupant in a rental
108 agreement or, subject to the requirements in a rental
109 agreement, the postal address or electronic mail address
110 provided by the occupant in a subsequent written notice of a
111 change of address.
112 (6) LATE FEE. Any fee or charge assessed for the
Page 4

(6) LATE FEE. Any fee or charge assessed for the
HB418 INTRODUCED
113 failure of an occupant to pay rent when due. The term does not
114 include interest on a debt; expenses incurred in the
115 collection of unpaid rent; expenses incurred for the
116 preservation, sale, or disposition of personal property
117 pursuant to this article; or costs associated with the
118 enforcement of any other remedy provided by law or contract.
119 (7) LEASED SPACE. The individual storage space at a
120 self-service storage facility which is rented to an occupant
121 pursuant to a rental agreement.
122 (8) OCCUPANT. A person entitled to the use of leased
123 space at a self-service storage facility under a rental
124 agreement, or his or her successors or assigns.
125 (9) OPERATOR. The owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor
126 of a self-service storage facility, or an agent of any of the
127 foregoing, or any other person authorized to manage the
128 facility or to receive rent from an occupant under a rental
129 agreement. The term does not include a warehouseman if the
130 warehouseman issues a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or
131 other document of title for the personal property stored.
132 (10) PERSONAL PROPERTY. Movable property not affixed to
133 land. The term includes, but is not limited to, goods, wares,
134 merchandise, motor vehicles, watercraft, household items, and
135 furnishings.
136 (11) PROPERTY WHICH THAT HAS NO COMMERCIAL VALUE.
137 Property offered for sale in a commercially reasonable sale
138 that receives no bid or offer.
139 (12) RENTAL AGREEMENT. Any written agreement or lease
140 that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, or rules
Page 5

that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, or rules
HB418 INTRODUCED
141 concerning the use and occupancy of leased space at a
142 self-service storage facility.
143 (13) SELF-SERVICE STORAGE FACILITY. Any real property
144 used for renting or leasing individual storage spaces in which
145 the occupants customarily store and remove their own personal
146 property on a self-service basis.
147 (14) VERIFIED MAIL. Any method of mailing offered by
148 the United States Postal Service or private delivery service
149 that provides evidence of the mailing."
150 "§8-15-44
151 (a) The operator of a self-service storage facility and
152 the heirs, executors, administrators, successors, and assigns
153 of the operator shall have a lien upon all of the personal
154 property of an occupant located at the self-service storage
155 facility for delinquent rent, late fees, labor, or other
156 charges incurred pursuant to a rental agreement and for
157 expenses incurred for preservation, sale, or disposition of
158 the personal property. The lien provided for in this section
159 is superior to any other lien or security interest, except for
160 a tax lien as otherwise provided by law.
161 (b) The lien described in subsection (a) attaches on
162 the date on which personal property is placed in a leased
163 space.
164 (c) The rental agreement shall contain a statement, in
165 bold type, advising the occupant of all of the following:
166 (1) The existence of the lien.
167 (2) That personal property stored in the leased space
168 may be sold to satisfy the lien if the occupant is in default.
Page 6

may be sold to satisfy the lien if the occupant is in default.
HB418 INTRODUCED
169 (3) That the occupant must disclose any lienholders
170 with an interest in property that is stored or will be stored
171 in the leased space.
172 (d) If the rental agreement specifies a limit on the
173 value of personal property that the occupant may store in the
174 leased space, the limit shall be deemed to be the maximum
175 value of the personal property in the leased space of the
176 occupant.
177 (e) The rental agreement may provide for a reasonable
178 late fee when the occupant is in default. A monthly late fee
179 of twenty dollars ($20) or 20 percent of the monthly rental
180 amount, whichever is greater, shall be considered reasonable
181 and is not a penalty.
182 (f) The rental agreement may be delivered and executed
183 by first-class mail or electronic means.
184 (g) If an occupant does not sign a written rental
185 agreement that the operator has delivered to the occupant by
186 first-class mail or electronic means, within 30 calendar days,
187 then the occupant's continued use of the leased space for not
188 less than 30 calendar days after the date the notice was
189 delivered shall constitute an acceptance of the rental
190 agreement with the same effect as if the agreement had been
191 signed by the occupant."
192 "§8-15-45
193 (a) If the occupant is in default, the operator may
194 deny the occupant access to the leased space at the
195 self-service storage facility. The operator may enter and
196 remove the personal property from the leased space to other
Page 7

remove the personal property from the leased space to other
HB418 INTRODUCED
197 suitable storage space pending its sale or other disposition.
198 (b) The rental agreement may contain a provision
199 notifying the occupant of the operator's right to dispose of
200 personal property remaining at the self-service storage
201 facility more than 15 days after the termination or nonrenewal
202 of the rental agreement.
203 (c) An occupant may not use a self-service storage
204 facility after the operator has delivered a written notice by
205 verified mail or electronic mail of the termination or
206 nonrenewal of the occupant's rental agreement. The notice
207 shall provide the occupant with not less than 15 calendar days
208 after delivery of the notice to remove all personal property
209 from the self-service storage facility.
210 (d) Prior to the occupant's removal of all personal
211 property, the operator may place reasonable restrictions on
212 the occupant's use of the self-service storage facility,
213 including denying access to the self-service storage facility
214 except for the occupant to remove personal property during the
215 operator's office hours. The operator may dispose of any
216 personal property remaining at the self-service storage
217 facility after the date provided in the written notice
218 pursuant to subsection (c)."
219 "§8-15-46
220 (a) If an occupant is in default for a period of more
221 than 30 days, the operator may enforce the lien granted in
222 Section 8-15-44 by selling the stored personal property of the
223 occupant. Sale of the personal property of an occupant may be
224 by public or private proceedings. The personal property may be
Page 8

by public or private proceedings. The personal property may be
HB418 INTRODUCED
225 sold as a unit or in parcels, by way of one or more contracts,
226 at any time or place, with bids or offers sealed or open, and
227 on any terms as long as the sale is a commercially reasonable
228 sale. The operator may otherwise dispose of any property which
229 that has no commercial value.
230 (b) Before conducting a sale under this section, the
231 operator shall do all of the following:
232 (1) At least 20 days before the sale, send notice of
233 default to the occupant and any lienholder identified by the
234 occupant in the rental agreement by verified mail or
235 electronic mail pursuant to subsection (h). The notice of
236 default shall include:
237 a. A statement that the contents of the leased space
238 are subject to the operator's lien.
239 b. A statement of the operator's claim, indicating the
240 charges due on the date of the notice, the amount of any
241 additional charges which that shall become due before the date
242 of sale, and the date the additional charges shall become due.
243 c. A demand for payment of the charges due within a
244 specified time, which shall not be less than 10 days after the
245 date of the notice.
246 d. A statement that unless the claim is paid within the
247 time stated, the contents of the leased space will be sold or
248 otherwise disposed of after a specified time.
249 e. The name, street address, and telephone number of
250 the operator or a designated agent whom the occupant may
251 contact to respond to the notice.
252 (2) At least seven days before the sale, an
Page 9

(2) At least seven days before the sale, an
HB418 INTRODUCED
253 advertisement containing the time, place, and terms of the
254 sale shall be published once in a newspaper of general
255 circulation in the county where the self-service storage
256 facility is located in any commercially reasonable manner. A
257 single advertisement listing multiple sales in a newspaper of
258 general circulation in the county shall suffice. If no
259 newspaper of general circulation is located in the county, or
260 if the operator determines, based on the previous experience
261 of the operator, that the contents of the leased space have a
262 value of five hundred dollars ($500) or less, then an
263 advertisement in any commercially reasonable manner shall
264 suffice. The manner of advertisement is deemed commercially
265 reasonable if it is likely to attract at least three
266 independent bidders to attend or view the sale in person or
267 online at the time and place advertised.
268 (c) The operator may buy the personal property of the
269 occupant at any public sale held pursuant to this section.
270 (d) If the personal property subject to the operator's
271 lien is a vehicle, watercraft, or trailer and rent and other
272 charges remain unpaid the occupant is in default for 60 days,
273 the operator may have the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer
274 towed from the self-service storage facility. The operator
275 shall not be liable for any damages to the vehicle,
276 watercraft, or trailer once a licensed and bonded tower takes
277 possession of the property. Removal of any vehicle,
278 watercraft, or trailer from the self-service storage facility
279 shall not release the operator's lien. The sale of a
280 watercraft shall comply with Section 33-5A-4. Any provision of
Page 10

watercraft shall comply with Section 33-5A-4. Any provision of
HB418 INTRODUCED
281 this article to the contrary notwithstanding, unclaimed motor
282 vehicles shall be reported in accordance with Section 32-8-84
283 and abandoned motor vehicles shall be sold in accordance with
284 Chapter 13 of Title 32.
285 (e) At any time before a sale is held under this
286 section or before a vehicle, watercraft, or trailer is towed
287 under this section, the occupant may pay the amount necessary
288 to satisfy the lien and redeem the personal property. The
289 operator shall have no liability to any person with respect to
290 personal property redeemed pursuant to this subsection.
291 (f) In the event of a sale, the operator may satisfy
292 the lien from the proceeds of the sale. The lien rights of
293 secured lienholders are automatically transferred to the
294 remaining proceeds of the sale, if any. If the sale is a
295 commercially reasonable sale, the operator shall not be
296 subject to any liability for a deficiency if the amount
297 realized at the sale does not satisfy any secured lien, but
298 shall hold the balance, if any, for delivery to the occupant
299 or any secured lienholder, upon demand. If the occupant or
300 secured lienholder, if any, does not claim the balance of the
301 proceeds within one year after the date of sale, the balance
302 shall become the property of the operator without further
303 recourse by the occupant or secured lienholder.
304 (g) A purchaser in good faith of any personal property
305 sold pursuant to this section to satisfy the lien granted in
306 Section 8-15-44 takes the property free and clear of any
307 rights of persons against whom the lien was valid, despite
308 noncompliance by the operator with the requirements of this
Page 11

noncompliance by the operator with the requirements of this
HB418 INTRODUCED
309 section. If the requirements of this article are not
310 satisfied, if the sale of the personal property is not in
311 conformity with the notice of sale, or if there is a willful
312 violation of this article, nothing in this section affects the
313 rights and liabilities of the owner, occupant, or any other
314 person.
315 (h) Notices to the occupant under subdivision (b)(1)
316 shall be sent to the last known address of the occupant by
317 verified mail or electronic mail. Notices sent by verified
318 mail shall be deemed delivered when deposited with the United
319 States Postal Service or private delivery service if they are
320 properly addressed with postage prepaid. Notices sent by
321 electronic mail shall be deemed delivered when an electronic
322 message is sent to the last known address provided by the
323 occupant. If the operator sends notice by electronic mail and
324 receives an automated message stating that the electronic mail
325 cannot be delivered, the operator shall send notice by
326 verified mail to the last known address of the occupant with
327 postage prepaid.
328 (i) If the operator complies with the requirements of
329 this section, the liability of the operator:
330 (1) To the occupant, shall be limited to the net
331 proceeds received from the sale of the personal property of
332 the occupant less any proceeds paid to the holders of any lien
333 or security interest of record on the personal property being
334 sold.; and
335 (2) To the holders of any lien or security interest of
336 record on the personal property being sold, shall be limited
Page 12

record on the personal property being sold, shall be limited
HB418 INTRODUCED
337 to the net proceeds received from the sale of any personal
338 property covered by the lien or security interest of the
339 holder."
340 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
341 1, 2026.
Page 13